Utah statutes.
31A-11-114.   Reports in lieu of examination of motor club.

In lieu of all or any part of an examination of a motor club under this title, the commissioner may accept the report of an:

(1)  audit conducted by a certified public accountant; or

(2)  examination made by a government agency.

